New York, session 2025-2026, A10717.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 301.2 of the family court act, as 2 amended by chapter 465 of the laws of 1992, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 3. "Detention" means the temporary care and maintenance of children 5 away from their own homes, as defined in section five hundred two of the 6 executive law. Detention of a person alleged to be or adjudicated as a 7 juvenile delinquent shall be authorized only in a facility certified by 8 the [division for youth] office of children and family services as a 9 detention facility pursuant to section five hundred three of the execu- 10 tive law. 11 § 2. Subdivision 1 of section 304.1 of the family court act, as 12 amended by section 59 of part WWW of chapter 59 of the laws of 2017, is 13 amended to read as follows: 14 1. A facility certified by the office of children and family services 15 as a juvenile non-secure or secure detention facility must be operated 16 in conformity with the regulations of the office of children and family 17 services. Every county, either individually or acting in collaboration 18 with one or more other counties, shall arrange for, or have access to, 19 sufficient certified juvenile non-secure and secure detention facili- 20 ties. 21 § 3. Subdivision 1 of section 320.5 of the family court act, as added 22 by chapter 920 of the laws of 1982, is amended to read as follows: 23 1. At the initial appearance, the court in its discretion may release 24 the respondent or direct [his] detention in a certified juvenile non-se- 25 cure or secure detention facility. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15216-01-6 A. 10717 2 1 § 4. Subdivision 1 of section 510.15 of the criminal procedure law, as 2 amended by chapter 813 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 1. When a principal who is under the age of sixteen is committed to 5 the custody of the sheriff the court must direct that the principal be 6 taken to and lodged in a place certified by the office of children and 7 family services as a juvenile non-secure or secure detention facility 8 for the reception of children. When a principal who (a) commencing 9 October first, two thousand eighteen, is sixteen years of age; or (b) 10 commencing October first, two thousand nineteen, is sixteen or seventeen 11 years of age, is committed to the custody of the sheriff, the court must 12 direct that the principal be taken to and lodged in a place certified by 13 the office of children and family services in conjunction with the state 14 commission of correction as a non-secure or specialized secure juvenile 15 detention facility for older youth. Where such a direction is made the 16 sheriff shall deliver the principal in accordance therewith and such 17 person shall although lodged and cared for in a juvenile detention 18 facility continue to be deemed to be in the custody of the sheriff. No 19 principal under the age specified to whom the provisions of this section 20 may apply shall be detained in any prison, jail, lockup, or other place 21 used for adults convicted of a crime or under arrest and charged with 22 the commission of a crime without the approval of the office of children 23 and family services which shall consult with the commission of 24 correction if the principal is sixteen years of age or older in the case 25 of each principal and the statement of its reasons therefor; nor shall a 26 principal under the age specified who is charged solely with a violation 27 as defined in subdivision three of section 10.00 of the penal law be 28 subject to detention. The sheriff shall not be liable for any acts done 29 to or by such principal resulting from negligence in the detention of 30 and care for such principal, when the principal is not in the actual 31 custody of the sheriff. 32 § 5. Subdivision 3 of section 502 of the executive law, as amended by 33 section 19 of part K of chapter 56 of the laws of 2019, is amended to 34 read as follows: 35 3. "Detention" means the temporary care and maintenance of youth held 36 away from their homes pursuant to article three of the family court act, 37 or held pending a hearing for alleged violation of the conditions of 38 release from an office of children and family services facility or 39 authorized agency, or held pending a hearing for alleged violation of 40 the condition of parole as a juvenile offender, youthful offender or 41 adolescent offender or held pending return to a jurisdiction other than 42 the one in which the youth is held, or held pursuant to or pending issu- 43 ance of a securing order of a criminal court if the youth named therein 44 as principal is charged as a juvenile offender, youthful offender or 45 adolescent offender or held pending a hearing on an extension of place- 46 ment or held pending transfer to a facility upon commitment or placement 47 by a court. Only alleged or convicted juvenile offenders, youthful 48 offenders or adolescent offenders who have not attained their eighteenth 49 or, commencing October first, two thousand eighteen, their twenty-first 50 birthday shall be subject to detention in a detention facility. Commenc- 51 ing October first, two thousand eighteen, a youth who on or after such 52 date committed or is charged with committing an offense when the youth 53 was sixteen years of age; or commencing October first, two thousand 54 nineteen, a youth who committed or is charged with committing an offense 55 on or after such date when the youth was seventeen years of age held 56 pursuant to or pending issuance of a securing order of a criminal court A. 10717 3 1 if the youth is charged as an adolescent offender or held pending a 2 hearing for alleged violation of the condition of parole as an adoles- 3 cent offender, [must] shall be held in a non-secure juvenile detention 4 facility certified by the state office of children and family services 5 or a specialized secure juvenile detention facility for older youth 6 certified by the state office of children and family services in 7 conjunction with the state commission of correction. Every county, 8 either individually or acting in collaboration with one or more other 9 counties, shall arrange for, or have access to, sufficient certified 10 juvenile non-secure, secure and specialized secure detention facilities. 11 § 6. Section 218-a of the county law, as amended by chapter 880 of the 12 laws of 1976, the opening paragraph of subdivision A as amended by chap- 13 ter 465 of the laws of 1992, paragraphs 1, 2, 3 and 4 of subdivision A 14 as amended by chapter 555 of the laws of 1978, paragraph 6 of subdivi- 15 sion A as added by section 82-b of part WWW of chapter 59 of the laws of 16 2017, subdivision B as amended by chapter 419 of the laws of 1987 and 17 subdivision C as added by section 12 of part E of chapter 57 of the laws 18 of 2005, is amended to read as follows: 19 § 218-a. County detention facilities for juvenile delinquents and 20 [persons in need of supervision] juvenile and adolescent offenders. A. 21 [To] The office of children and family services shall promulgate regu- 22 lations to assure that suitable and conveniently accessible accommo- 23 dations and proper and adequate detention in secure, specialized secure 24 and non-secure detention facilities, as defined in section five hundred 25 two of the executive law and the regulations of the [division for youth] 26 office of children and family services, will be available when required 27 for the temporary care, maintenance and security of alleged and 28 convicted juvenile offenders, alleged and adjudicated juvenile delin- 29 quents and alleged and [adjudicated persons in need of supervision] 30 convicted adolescent offenders. Such regulations shall not require any 31 county to provide temporary care in a secure detention facility for 32 residents of any other county except upon a space available basis, 33 provided, however, that to the extent practicable, counties may collab- 34 orate in accordance with paragraph three or four of this subdivision to 35 jointly provide for or arrange access to sufficient certified juvenile 36 non-secure, secure and specialized secure detention facilities certified 37 by the office of children and family services. The county executive, if 38 there be one, otherwise the board of supervisors shall designate the 39 agency of county government responsible for the administration of the 40 county juvenile detention program and shall so advise the New York state 41 [division for youth] office of children and family services, and may 42 make provisions therefor as follows: 43 1. Provide for the continued operation of the county's established 44 detention facility, so long as it complies with regulations of the 45 [division for youth] office of children and family services, and is 46 certified by [that division] such office. 47 2. Authorize a contract between its county and one or more other coun- 48 ties, which is or are operating a conveniently accessible detention 49 facility certified by the [division for youth] office of children and 50 family services and in compliance with regulations of [the division for 51 youth] such office, providing for the reception, temporary accommodation 52 and care in such facility of alleged or adjudicated juvenile delinquents 53 and pre-dispositional placements for alleged persons in need of super- 54 vision held for or at the direction of its family court, for and in 55 consideration of the payments to be made therefor, on a per capita 56 basis, pursuant to the terms of such contract. A. 10717 4 1 3. Authorize a contract between its county and one or more other coun- 2 ties providing for the joint operation and maintenance by them of an 3 already established county detention facility certified by the state 4 [division for youth] office of children and family services and operated 5 and maintained in compliance with the regulations of [the division for 6 youth] such office, which is conveniently accessible to the counties 7 concerned. Such authorization and contract may include provisions for 8 remodeling or enlarging the building of such facility. 9 4. Authorize a contract between its county and one or more other coun- 10 ties providing for the joint establishment, operation and maintenance by 11 such counties of a new joint county detention facility which shall be 12 located on a site conveniently accessible to the counties concerned and 13 which shall be certified by the state [division for youth] office of 14 children and family services and which shall be established, operated 15 and maintained in compliance with the regulations of [the division for 16 youth] such office. 17 5. The resolution providing for joint action under paragraph three or 18 four [above] of this subdivision shall be adopted by the board of super- 19 visors of each of the several counties affected, and a committee 20 composed of at least one member of each of such boards shall be created 21 to acquire the necessary real property in the name of the counties 22 affected, and as the joint agent of such counties such committee shall 23 have charge of the construction, equipment, maintenance and operation of 24 such joint county detention facility and, with the advice of an advisory 25 committee consisting of the judge of the family court and the commis- 26 sioner of social services of each of said counties, shall supervise and 27 control the maintenance and operation of such joint county detention 28 facility. The said resolution may specify the matters as to which the 29 action of such committee shall require the joint approval of the boards 30 of supervisors of all the counties affected and shall prescribe the 31 proportions to be borne by each of the several counties affected of the 32 costs of acquisition of the site and of construction of a new joint 33 county detention facility and the proportions to be borne by each of the 34 several counties affected of the costs of operation of such joint county 35 detention facility, whether established by new joint acquisition and 36 construction or by utilization of an existing county detention facility. 37 The moneys to pay the share to be borne by each county affected shall be 38 provided by appropriation in such amounts and at such times as may be 39 agreed upon. 40 6. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, commencing October 41 first, two thousand eighteen, a county [must] shall provide for adequate 42 detention of alleged or convicted adolescent offenders in a juvenile 43 non-secure detention facility or a specialized secure detention facility 44 for older youth who are alleged or convicted of committing an offense 45 when they were sixteen years of age and commencing October first, two 46 thousand nineteen, a county [must] shall provide for adequate detention 47 of alleged or convicted adolescent offenders in a juvenile non-secure 48 detention facility or a specialized secure detention facility for older 49 youth who are alleged or convicted of committing an offense when they 50 were sixteen or seventeen years of age. [Such] A specialized secure 51 detention facility for older youth shall be certified and regulated by 52 the office of children and family services in conjunction with the state 53 commission of correction[. Such facility] and shall: (i) have enhanced 54 security features and specially trained staff; and (ii) be jointly 55 administered by the agency of county government designated in accordance 56 with this subdivision [A of this section] and the applicable county A. 10717 5 1 sheriff, which both shall have the power to perform all acts necessary 2 to carry out their duties. The county sheriff shall be subject to the 3 same laws that apply to the designated county agency regarding the 4 protection and confidentiality of the information about the youth in 5 such facility and shall prevent access thereto by, or the distribution 6 thereof to, persons not authorized by law. 7 B. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each board of supervi- 8 sors shall provide or assure the availability of conveniently accessible 9 and adequate non-secure detention facilities, certified by the state 10 [division for youth] office of children and family services, as 11 resources for the family court in the county pursuant to [articles seven 12 and] article three of the family court act and for the youth part in the 13 superior court in the county, to be operated in compliance with the 14 regulations of the [division for youth] office of children and family 15 services for the temporary care and maintenance of alleged and adjudi- 16 cated juvenile delinquents [and persons in need of supervision] held for 17 or at the direction of a family court and for the detention of alleged 18 and convicted juvenile and adolescent offenders held by or pending issu- 19 ance of a securing order. 20 C. Each county shall offer diversion services to children who are at 21 risk of being the subject of a petition under [article] articles three 22 and seven of the family court act. Such services shall be designed to 23 provide an immediate response to families in crisis and to identify and 24 utilize appropriate alternatives to juvenile detention. 25 § 7. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 26 have become a law.